New York, session 2025-2026, S8068.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 16 of section 501 of the executive law, as 2 added by chapter 465 of the laws of 1992 and as renumbered by chapter 3 170 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: 4 16. To develop and publish, in consultation with the commissioner of 5 the department of health, a postcard containing information about 6 publicly available child care assistance programs and how individuals 7 may apply for and receive assistance under such programs. 8 17. To perform such acts as are necessary or convenient to carry out 9 the division's functions, powers and duties in furtherance of the best 10 interests of youth, consistent with the provisions of this article. 11 § 2. Section 206 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 12 subdivision 32 to read as follows: 13 32. The commissioner shall mail informational postcards about publicly 14 available child care assistance programs, as developed and published by 15 the office of children and family services, to the residential address 16 that is listed on a certificate of live birth and registered with the 17 department. 18 § 3. Section 17-166 of the administrative code of the city of New York 19 is amended by adding a new subdivision f to read as follows: 20 f. The department shall mail informational postcards about publicly 21 available child care assistance programs, as developed and published by 22 the office of children and family services, to the residential address EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06463-01-5 S. 8068 2 1 that is listed on a certificate of live birth and registered with the 2 department. 3 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 4 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 5 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 6 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 7 completed on or before such effective date.